Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-210
Securities; kinds
authorized; pledge with Department of Banking and Finance.

Securities pledged pursuant to section
8-209 shall consist of any securities which constitute a legal
investment for the trust company except for bills of exchange, notes, mortgages,
banker's acceptances, or certificates of deposit. State, county, municipal,
and corporate bond issues must be of investment quality and be rated in the
three top categories of investment by at least one nationally recognized rating
service, except that all issues of counties and municipalities of Nebraska
shall be acceptable.

Such securities shall not be accepted for purpose of pledge
at a rate above par value and if their market value is less than par value
they shall not be accepted for such purpose above their actual market value.
The safekeeping of such securities and all other expenses incidental to the
pledging of such securities shall be at the expense of the trust company.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 10, p. 721;

C.S.1922, § 8072;

C.S.1929, § 8-210;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 76, p. 175;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-210;

R.S.1943, § 8-210;

Laws 1957, c. 13, § 1, p. 136;

Laws 1959, c. 263, § 2, p. 922;

Laws 1967, c. 23, § 1, p. 127;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 24;

Laws 2009, LB327, § 8.